lexc/verb/enhuigea.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ §oe2§ 
§felteo2§ §sj§  §ess§ §igeoe§ §igeoue§ §oeue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ §igeuomely§
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§ §ae2mely§ §oe2mely§
§szorelolmely§ §felteo2mely§ §l§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;


LEXICON Verb1
arrébbmozdít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
arrébbtaszít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bennefelejt AddVerbbujt; !igea
bentfelejt AddVerbbujt; !igea
együttalakít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
eléhajt AddVerbbujt; !igea
feljebbminősít AddVerbbekit;
föléhajt AddVerbbujt;
helybenlazít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
kintfelejt AddVerbbujt; !igea
kétségbeejt AddVerbbujt; !igea
nagytakarít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
odébbhajlít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
odébbhajít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
odébbtaszít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
teligurít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
telimerít AddVerbbekit;
viszontbiztosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
észheztérít AddVerbbekit;
útbaejt AddVerbbujt; !igea


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command


LEXICON AddVerbmelyabranditott
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmelyabranditott;

LEXICON Repmelyabranditott
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae2mely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae2mely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2mely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2mely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeoe§tt      #;    ! t
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae2mely§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo2mely§g§AAmely§t  Impermelyabrandit;
                    Imper1melyabrandit;

LEXICON AddVerbmelyabrandit
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmelyabrandit;

LEXICON Repmelyabrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae2mely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae2mely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae2mely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2mely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2mely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae2mely§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo2mely§g§AAmely§t  Impermelyabrandit;
                    Imper1melyabrandit;

LEXICON Impermelyabrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmelyabrandit;
                      Nrepmelyabrandit2;
LEXICON Imper1melyabrandit
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Nrepmelyabrandit;
                      Nrep1melyabrandit;

LEXICON Nrepmelyabrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyabrandit;
                      NImpermelyabrandit2;
LEXICON Nrepmelyabrandit2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyabrandit;
                      NImpermelyabrandit2;

LEXICON Nrep1melyabrandit
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo2mely§g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyabrandit;
                      NImper1melyabrandit;

LEXICON NImpermelyabrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelyabrandit;
                      Potmelyabrandit2;
LEXICON NImpermelyabrandit2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelyabrandit;
                      Potmelyabrandit2;

LEXICON NImper1melyabrandit
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Potmelyabrandit;
                      Pot1melyabrandit;

LEXICON Potmelyabrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelybrandit;
             Casemelyabrandit;
LEXICON Potmelyabrandit2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelybrandit;
             Casemelyabrandit;

LEXICON Pot1melyabrandit
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelybrandit;
             Case1melyabrandit;

LEXICON AddInfmelybrandit
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
            Casemelyabrandit;

LEXICON Verb
aggálytalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
akarattalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
akósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
alkalmasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
andalít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
anyásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
archaikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
asztmásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
avatagít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bajosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
barbárít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
beszédhibásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bizalmasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
blokkosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
boglyasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
boldogtalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
boltozatosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bornemisszásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
borzasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
boyosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
buborékosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
busásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bálásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bávít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
bódít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
cafatosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
cigánytalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
cirmosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csalárdít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csersavasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csinosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csodálatosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csoportosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csábít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
csúfít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
céltalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
diabolikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
dilinósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
dombornyomásosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
dumásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
egyeduralmasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
elmebajosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
etikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
fajtalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
felhólyagosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
fodrosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
foltosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
formátlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
furfangosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
félkilósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
gazmentesít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
gorombít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
gyilkosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
görgőscsapágyasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
halasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hangzósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hasztalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hazárdít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hiánytalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hosszasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
háklisít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
hézagosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
igazságosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
inflációsít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
iszaptalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
javíthatatlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
jóságosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
kanyargósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
karácsonyosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
kizárólagosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
koncentrikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
korláttalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
kritikátlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
kásásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
központosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
lanyhít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
likacsosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
lovagiatlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
lármásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
lúdtalpasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
magánosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
mattosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
mocsarasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
morzsátlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
mámorosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
módosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
naturalisztikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
nyilvánvalósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
nyákosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
olaszosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
oszloposít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
parttalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
pindurít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
pokrócosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
portosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
pufókít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
pírosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
reumatikusít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
rondít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
rácsosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
salakosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
sikít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
sorozatosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
sudarasít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
szakmásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
szenzációsít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
szobásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
szuverénít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
százalékosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
sártalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
takarékosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
tartósít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
toprongyosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
tubákosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
tántorít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
tódít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
utcásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
vall AddVerbmelyabranditott;
varázslatosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
villamostalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
viszonyít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
válthatatlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
vízhatlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
zselésít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
Óperenciásít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
állhatatlanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
árnyéktalanít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
ólmosít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
útbaigazít AddVerbmelyabrandit;
